test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-yaTS_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - я: # Noun 'land / (fin) maa' - partial paradigm /Type 1 a→o/ - ya
     я+N+Sg+Nom: я
     я+N+Sg+Acc: ямʼ
     я+N+Sg+Gen: яʼ
     я+N+Sg+Dat: янʼ
     я+N+Sg+Loc: яхана
     я+N+Sg+Abl: яхад
     я+N+Sg+Pros: явна
     я+N+Du+Nom: яхаʼ
     я+N+Du+Acc: яхаʼ
     я+N+Du+Gen: яхаʼ
     я+N+Pl+Nom: яˮ
     я+N+Pl+Acc: ё
     я+N+Pl+Gen: ёˮ
     я+N+Pl+Dat: яхаˮ
     я+N+Pl+Loc: яхаˮна
     я+N+Pl+Abl: яхат
     я+N+Pl+Pros: [яˮамна, ёˮомна]
     я+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: [яв, ями]
     я+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: [яв, ями]
     я+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: [ян, яни]
     я+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [яхан, яхани]
     я+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: [яханан, яханани]
     я+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: [яхадан, яхадани]
     я+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: [явнан, явнани]
     я+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: [яхаюн, яхаюни]
     я+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: [яхаюн, яхаюни]
     я+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: [яхаюн, яхаюни]
     я+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: [ён, ёни]
     я+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: [ён, ёни]
     я+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: [ёˮон, ёˮни]
     я+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: [яхаˮн, яхаˮни]
     я+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: [яхаˮнан, яхаˮнани]
     я+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: [яхатан, яхатани]
     я+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: [яˮамнан, ёˮомнан, яˮамнани, ёˮомнани]
     я+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: яр
     я+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: ямд
     я+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: янд
     я+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: яханд
     я+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: яхананд
     я+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: яхаданд
     я+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: явнанд
     я+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: яхаюд
     я+N+Du+Acc+PxSg2: яхаюд
     я+N+Du+Gen+PxSg2: яхают
     я+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: ёд
     я+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: ёд
     я+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: ёт
     я+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: яхат
     я+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: яхаˮнат
     я+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: яхатат
     я+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: [яˮамнат, ёˮомнат]
     я+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: яда
     я+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: ямда
     я+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: янда
     я+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: яханда
     я+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: яхананда
     я+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: яхаданда
     я+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: явнанда
     я+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: яхаюда
     я+N+Du+Acc+PxSg3: яхаюда
     я+N+Du+Gen+PxSg3: яхаюта
     я+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: ёда
     я+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: ёда
     я+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: ёта
     я+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: яхата
     я+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: яхаˮната
     я+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: яхатата
     я+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: [яˮамната, ёˮомната]
     я+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: ямиʼ
#     я+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1.2: ями
     я+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: ямиʼ
#     я+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1.2: ями
     я+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: яниʼ
#     я+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1.2: яни
     я+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: яханиʼ
#     я+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1.2: яхани
     я+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: яхананиʼ
#     я+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1.2: яханани
     я+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: яхаданиʼ
#     я+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1.2: яхадани
     я+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: явнаниʼ
#     я+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1.2: явнани
     я+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: яхаюниʼ
#     я+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1.2: яхаюни
     я+N+Du+Acc+PxDu1: яхаюниʼ
#     я+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1.2: яхаюни
     я+N+Du+Gen+PxDu1: яхаюниʼ
#     я+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1.2: яхаюни
     я+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: ёниʼ
#     я+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1.2: ёни
     я+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: ёниʼ
#     я+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1.2: ёни
     я+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: ёˮниʼ
#     я+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1.2: ёˮни
     я+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: яхаˮниʼ
#     я+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1.2: яхаˮни
     я+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: яхаˮнаниʼ
#     я+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1.2: яхаˮнани
     я+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: яхатаниʼ
#     я+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1.2: яхатани
     я+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: [яˮамнаниʼ, ёˮомнаниʼ]
#     я+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1.2: [яˮамнани, ёˮомнани]
     я+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: яриʼ
     я+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: ямдиʼ
     я+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: яндиʼ
     я+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: яхандиʼ
     я+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: яханандиʼ
     я+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: яхадандиʼ
     я+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: явнандиʼ
     я+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: яхаюдиʼ
     я+N+Du+Acc+PxDu2: яхаюдиʼ
     я+N+Du+Gen+PxDu2: яхаютиʼ
     я+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: ёдиʼ
     я+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: ёдиʼ
     я+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: ётиʼ
     я+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: яхатиʼ
     я+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: яхаˮнатиʼ
     я+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: яхататиʼ
     я+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: [яˮамнатиʼ, ёˮомнатиʼ]
     я+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: ядиʼ
     я+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: ямдиʼ
     я+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: яндиʼ
     я+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: яхандиʼ
     я+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: яханандиʼ
     я+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: яхадандиʼ
     я+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: явнандиʼ
     я+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: яхаюдиʼ
     я+N+Du+Acc+PxDu3: яхаюдиʼ
     я+N+Du+Gen+PxDu3: яхаютиʼ
     я+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: ёдиʼ
     я+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: ёдиʼ
     я+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: ётиʼ
     я+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: яхатиʼ
     я+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: яхаˮнатиʼ
     я+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: яхататиʼ
     я+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: [яˮамнатиʼ, ёˮомнатиʼ]
     я+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: яваˮ
     я+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: яваˮ
     я+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: янаˮ
     я+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: яханаˮ
     я+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: яхананаˮ
     я+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: яхаданаˮ
     я+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: явнанаˮ
     я+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: яхаюнаˮ
     я+N+Du+Acc+PxPl1: яхаюнаˮ
     я+N+Du+Gen+PxPl1: яхаюнаˮ
     я+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: ёнаˮ
     я+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: ёнаˮ
     я+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: ёˮнаˮ
     я+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: яхаˮнаˮ
     я+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: яхаˮнанаˮ
     я+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: яхатанаˮ
     я+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: [яˮамнанаˮ, ёˮомнанаˮ]
     я+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: яраˮ
     я+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: ямдаˮ
     я+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: яндаˮ
     я+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: яхандаˮ
     я+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: яханандаˮ
     я+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: яхадандаˮ
     я+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: явнандаˮ
     я+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: яхаюдаˮ
     я+N+Du+Acc+PxPl2: яхаюдаˮ
     я+N+Du+Gen+PxPl2: яхаютаˮ
     я+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: ёдаˮ
     я+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: ёдаˮ
     я+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: ётаˮ
     я+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: яхатаˮ
     я+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: яхаˮнатаˮ
     я+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: яхататаˮ
     я+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: [яˮамнатаˮ, ёˮомнатаˮ]
     я+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: ядоʼ
     я+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: ямдоʼ
     я+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: яндоʼ
     я+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: яхандоʼ
     я+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: яханандоʼ
     я+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: яхадандоʼ
     я+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: явнандоʼ
     я+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: яхаюдоʼ
     я+N+Du+Acc+PxPl3: яхаюдоʼ
     я+N+Du+Gen+PxPl3: яхаютоʼ
     я+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: ёдоʼ
     я+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: ёдоʼ
     я+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: ётоʼ
     я+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: яхатоʼ
     я+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: яхаˮнатоʼ
     я+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: яхататоʼ
     я+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: [яˮамнатоʼ, ёˮомнатоʼ]
     я+N+Pred+Abs: яд
     я+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: [ядав, ядув, ядами, ядми]
     я+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: [ядав, ядув, ядами, ядми]
     я+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: [ядан, ядани, ядни]
     я+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: ядар
     я+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: ядамд
     я+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: яданд
     я+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: [ядада, ядда]
     я+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: ядамда
     я+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: яданда
     я+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: [ядамиʼ, ядмиʼ]
#     я+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1.2: [ядами, ядми]
     я+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: [ядамиʼ, ядмиʼ]
#     я+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1.2: [ядами, ядми]
     я+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu1: [яданиʼ, ядниʼ]
#     я+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1.2: [ядани, ядни]
     я+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu2: [ядариʼ, ядриʼ]
     я+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu2: ядамдиʼ
     я+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu2: ядандиʼ
     я+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu3: [ядадиʼ, яддиʼ]
     я+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu3: ядамдиʼ
     я+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu3: ядандиʼ
     я+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl1: [ядаваˮ, ядваˮ]
     я+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl1: [ядаваˮ, ядваˮ]
     я+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl1: [яданаˮ, яднаˮ]
     я+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl2: [ядараˮ, ядраˮ]
     я+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl2: ядамдаˮ
     я+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl2: ядандаˮ
     я+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl3: [ядадоʼ, яддоʼ]
     я+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl3: ядамдоʼ
     я+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl3: ядандоʼ
     я+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: ядмʼ
     я+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: ян
     я+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: я
     я+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: яниʼ
     я+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: ядиʼ
     я+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: яхаʼ
     я+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: яваˮ
     я+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: ядаˮ
     я+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: яˮ
     я+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: ядамзь
     я+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: янась
     я+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ясь
     я+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: янинзь
     я+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: ядинзь
     я+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: яханзь
     я+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: яваць
     я+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: ядаць
     я+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: яць
     я+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: яв
     я+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: яр
     я+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: яда
     я+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ямиʼ
     я+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: яриʼ
     я+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ядиʼ
     я+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: яваˮ
     я+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: яраˮ
     я+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ядоʼ
     я+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: явась
     я+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ярась
     я+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ядась
     я+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: яминзь
     я+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: яринзь
     я+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ядинзь
     я+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: яваць
     я+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: яраць
     я+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ядонзь
     я+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: яхаюн
     я+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: яхаюд
     я+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: яхаюда
     я+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: яхаюниʼ
     я+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: яхаюдиʼ
     я+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: яхаюдиʼ
     я+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: яхаюнаˮ
     я+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: яхаюдаˮ
     я+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: яхаюдоʼ
     я+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: яхаюнась
     я+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: яхаюдась
     я+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: яхаюдась
     я+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: яхаюнинзь
     я+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: яхаюдинзь
     я+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: яхаюдинзь
     я+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: яхаюнаць
     я+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: яхаюдаць
     я+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: яхаюдонзь
     я+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ён
     я+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ёд
     я+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ёда
     я+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ёниʼ
     я+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ёдиʼ
     я+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ёдиʼ
     я+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ёнаˮ
     я+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ёдаˮ
     я+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ёдоʼ
     я+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ёнась
     я+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ёдась
     я+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ёдась
     я+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ёнинзь
     я+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ёдинзь
     я+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ёдинзь
     я+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ёнаць
     я+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ёдаць
     я+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ёдонзь
     я+N+Tra: яӈэ
     я+N+Car: ясиˮ
     я+N+Equ: ядремʼ
     я+N+Equ+Lat: ядревʼ
